Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2105.01
Certified art therapist, defined.

Certified art therapist means a person who is certified to practice art therapy pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act and who holds a current certificate issued by the department.

Laws 2024, LB605, § 8.